Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1502.01
Highway superintendent; abolition; procedure.

When a county highway superintendent has been appointed following an election held pursuant to section 39-1502, such position may be abolished at any general election after two years from the date of such election in the same manner as the appointment was approved.

Laws 1961, c. 199, § 1, p. 602.